Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-636
District; rates; agreement with security holders.

The directors of any district organized under or subject to Chapter 70, article 6, are authorized to agree with the holders of any such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness as to the maximum or minimum amounts which such district shall charge and collect for water, electric energy, radioactive material or the energy therefrom, hydrogen, ethanol, or other service sold by the district.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 9, p. 350;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 6, p. 585;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-709;

R.S.1943, § 70-636;

Laws 1944, Spec. Sess., c. 6, § 1(7), p. 113;

Laws 1959, c. 316, § 5, p. 1161;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 22;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 44;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 13.

Potentially conflicting interests within a class are incompatible with the maintenance of a true class action and this aspect may be disposed of upon motion for summary judgment. Blankenship v. Omaha P. P. Dist., 195 Neb. 170, 237 N.W.2d 86 (1976).